da: Kompatibilitet med hemisfære: Begge / universel; Den nordlige halvkugle; Den sydlige halvkugle; Andet
pl: Kompatybilność z półkulą: Obie / uniwersalna; Półkula północna; Półkula południowa; Inne
sk-SK: Kompatibilita s hemisférami: Obidve / univerzálne; Severná pologuľa; Južná pologuľa; Iné
ja: 半球適合性: 両方 / ユニバーサル; 北半球; 南半球; その他
en: Hemisphere compatibility: Both / Universal; Northern Hemisphere; Southern Hemisphere; Other
sv: Halvklotskompatibilitet: Båda / universell; Norra halvklotet; Södra halvklotet; Annat
hu: Félteke kompatibilitás: Mindkettő / Univerzális; Északi félteke; Déli félteke; Egyéb
el: Συμβατότητα ημισφαιρίων: Και τα δύο / Γενικής χρήσης; Βόρειο Ημισφαίριο; Νότιο Ημισφαίριο; Άλλο
zh-CN: 半球适配性: 均适用/通用; 北半球; 南半球; 其他
cs: Kompatibilita s hemisférami: Obojí/univerzální; Severní polokoule; Jižní polokoule; Jiné
vi: Khả năng tương thích bán cầu: Cả hai/Toàn cầu; Bắc bán cầu; Nam bán cầu; Khác
bg-BG: Съвместимост с полукълбо: Двете / Универсален; Северно полукълбо; Южно полукълбо; Други
fr: Compatibilité avec l’hémisphère: Les deux/Universel; Hémisphère nord; Hémisphère sud; Autre
pt-PT: Compatibilidade hemisférica: Ambos/Universal; Hemisfério norte; Hemisfério sul; Outro
lt-LT: Pusrutulio suderinamumas: Abu / Universalus; Šiaurės pusrutulis; Pietų pusrutulis; Kita
nb: Kompatibilitet mellom hemisfære: Begge / universell; Nordlige halvkule; Sørlige halvkule; Annet
sl-SI: Združljivost s poloblo (hemisfero): Oboje / univerzalno; Severna polobla; Južna polobla; Drugo
ko: 반구 호환성: 모두 / 공용; 북반구; 남반구; 기타
tr: Yarım küre uyumluluğu: Her ikisi/evrensel; Kuzey Yarım Küre; Güney Yarım Küre; Diğer
pt-BR: Compatibilidade hemisférica: Ambos / Universal; Hemisfério Norte; Hemisfério Sul; Outros
th: ความเข้ากันได้กับซีกโลก: ทั้งสอง/สากล; ซีกโลกเหนือ; ซีกโลกใต้; อื่นๆ
it: Compatibilità emisferica: Entrambi / Universale; Emisfero boreale; Emisfero australe; Altro
ru: Совместимость с полушарием: Оба / универсальная; Северное полушарие; Южное полушарие; Другое
ro-RO: Compatibilitatea emisferelor: Ambele / Universal; Emisfera nordică; Emisfera sudică; Altele
fi: Pallonpuoliskon yhteensopivuus: Molemmat / Yleiskäyttöinen; Pohjoinen pallonpuolisko; Eteläinen pallonpuolisko; Muu
nl: Halfrond compatibiliteit: Beide / universeel; Noordelijk halfrond; Zuidelijk halfrond; Overig
zh-TW: 半球相容性: 兩者 / 通用; 北半球; 南半球; 其他
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost hemisfera: Obje / univerzalno; Sjeverna hemisfera; Južna hemisfera; Ostalo
es: Compatibilidad hemisférica: Ambos / universal; Hemisferio norte; Hemisferio sur; Otro
de: Kompatibilität mit Hemisphären: Beide/Universal; Nordhalbkugel; Südhalbkugel; Andere